src-fst-morphology-affixes-propernouns.lexc.md
* Njierek # Odd-syllable test examples:*
* *Njierek:* `Njierek+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom`
* *Njieregij:* `Njierek+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill`
* *Njieregis:* `Njierek+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ela`

LEXICON LONDON-orgsur  Names that can be both organizations and surnames.Not used in Smj-propernouns

* Rieser # Odd-syllable test examples:*
* *Rieser:* `Rieser+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Nom`
* *Rieserij:* `Rieser+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Ill`
* *Rieseris:* `Rieser+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Ela`

LEXICON LONDON-obj  Objects. 

* Rovdjursutredningen # Odd-syllable test examples:*
* *Rovdjursutredningen:* `Rovdjursutredningen+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Nom`
* *Rovdjursutredningenij:* `Rovdjursutredningen+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Ill`
* *Rovdjursutredningenis:* `Rovdjursutredningen+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Ela`

LEXICON LONDON-LOAN-obj  Objects loan. Not used in smj-propernouns

* Sameloven # Odd-syllable test examples:*
* *Sameloven:* `Sameloven+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Nom`
* ★*Samelovenij:* `Sameloven+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Ill` (is not standard language)
* ★*Samelovenis:* `Sameloven+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Ela` (is not standard language)

LEXICON LONDON-LOAN-plc  Only nominatives. Placenames loan. Not used in Smj-propernouns

* Jordandalen # Odd-syllable test examples:*
* *Jordandalen:* `Jordandalen+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom`
* ★*Jordandalenij:* `Jordandalen+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill` (is not standard language)
* ★*Jordandalenis:* `Jordandalen+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ela` (is not standard language)

LEXICON LONDON-LOAN-org   Only nominative. Organizations loan.Not used in smj-propernouns

* Samfunnsavdelingen # Odd-syllable test examples:*
* *Samfunnsavdelingen:* `Samfunnsavdelingen+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Nom`
* ★*Samfunnsavdelingenij:* `Samfunnsavdelingen+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ill` (is not standard language)
* ★*Samfunnsavdelingenis:* `Samfunnsavdelingen+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ela` (is not standard language)

JOKULL-plc are placenames. Lexicon added to make the code compile (?)

 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc: LONDONDECL-PLC-SUR ;  Placenames. NB added to make the code compile, needs revision. Gets an odd syllable case marking. Non-assimilated stems.

* Drangajökull # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *Drangajökull:* `Drangajökull+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom`
* *Drangajökullij:* `Drangajökull+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill`
* *Drangajökullis:* `Drangajökull+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ela`

Words in lexicon ANAR  end on conconant, no cg, case marking with ill -ij, ela -is. Gets an odd syllable case marking. Lule sami stems.

LEXICON ANAR-mal  Male names. 

LEXICON ANAR-plc   Place names

* Guhttás # Odd-syllable test examples:*
* *Guhttás:* `Guhttás+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom`
* *Guhttásij:* `Guhttás+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill`
* *Guhttásis:* `Guhttás+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ela`

Words in PIPPI lexicons are i-final, have no cg, no second syllable vowel change, and get odd syllable case marking with acc -hav, ill -hij, elat -his, etc. Works as "riebij", but without the -j in nominative (it should maybe be Sirij and Pippij in nom?) and without cg. The last syllable is unstressed. Non-assimilated stems. 

LEXICON PIPPI-ani  IVowel-final names where case endings are added directly, no cg. Animals.

* Rullahuuli # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *Rullahuuli:* `Rullahuuli+N+Prop+Sem/Ani+Sg+Nom`
* *Rullahuulihij:* `Rullahuuli+N+Prop+Sem/Ani+Sg+Ill`
* *Rullahuulihis:* `Rullahuuli+N+Prop+Sem/Ani+Sg+Ela`

LEXICON PIPPI-obj  Vowel-final names where case endings are added directly, no cg. Object names

* Audi # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *Audi:* `Audi+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Nom`
* *Audihij:* `Audi+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Ill`
* *Audihis:* `Audi+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Ela`

LEXICON PIPPI-org  Vowel-final names where caseendings are added directly, no cg. organizations

* Kon-Tiki # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *Kon-Tiki:* `Kon-Tiki+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Nom`
* *Kon-Tikihij:* `Kon-Tiki+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ill`
* *Kon-Tikihis:* `Kon-Tiki+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ela`

LEXICON PIPPI-mal  Vowel-final names where case are added directly, no cg. Male names

* Gianni # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *Gianni:* `Gianni+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Nom`
* *Giannihij:* `Gianni+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ill`
* *Giannihis:* `Gianni+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ela`

LEXICON PIPPI-fem  Vowel-final names where case endings are added directly, no cg. Female names

* Guri # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *Guri:* `Guri+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Nom`
* *Gurihij:* `Guri+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Ill`
* *Gurihis:* `Guri+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Ela`

LEXICON PIPPI-femsur  Vowel-final names where case endings are added directly, no cg. Female names also used as surnames

* Turi # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *Turi:* `Turi+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Nom`
* *Turihij:* `Turi+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Ill`
* *Turihij:* `Turi+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Ill`
* *Turihis:* `Turi+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Ela`

LEXICON PIPPI-malfem  Vowel-final names where case endings are added directly, no cg. Names that can be both female and male names

* Kari # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *Kari:* `Kari+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Nom`
* *Kari:* `Kari+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Nom`
* *Karihij:* `Kari+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ill`
* *Karihis:* `Kari+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ela`

* # Even-syllable test examples:*

* # Even-syllable test examples:*

LEXICON PIPPI-sur  Vowel-final names where case endings are added directly, no cg. Surnames

* Sammallahti # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *Sammallahti:* `Sammallahti+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Nom`
* *Sammallahtihij:* `Sammallahti+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Ill`
* *Sammallahtihis:* `Sammallahti+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Ela`

* # Even-syllable test examples:*

LEXICON PIPPI-plc  Vowel-final names where caseendings are added directly, no cg. Place names

* Lapinlampi # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *Lapinlampi:* `Lapinlampi+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom`
* *Lapinlampihij:* `Lapinlampi+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill`
* *Lapinlampihis:* `Lapinlampi+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ela`

* # Even-syllable test examples:*

LEXICON PIPPI-LOAN-plc  Only nominatives. Vowel-final names where case endings are added directly, no cg.Place names

* Haltiatunturi # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *Haltiatunturi:* `Haltiatunturi+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom`
* ★*Haltiatunturijij:* `Haltiatunturi+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill` (is not standard language)
* ★*Haltiatunturijis:* `Haltiatunturi+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ela` (is not standard language)

* # Even-syllable test examples:*

* # Even-syllable test examples:*

Words in lexicon DUORTNUS end on conconant, have cg and second syllable vowel change o:u, e:á. Odd syllable case marking. Real lule sami or one non-assimilated stem.

LEXICON DUORTNUS-mal  Male names

* Mihkal # Odd-syllable test examples:*
* *Mihkal:* `Mihkal+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Nom`
* *Mihkkalij:* `Mihkal+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ill`
* *Mihkkalis:* `Mihkal+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ela`

LEXICON DUORTNUS-sur  Male names

* Vándar # Odd-syllable test examples:*
* *Vándar:* `Vándar+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Nom`
* *Vánndarij:* `Vándar+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Ill`
* *Vánndaris:* `Vándar+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Ela`

LEXICON DUORTNUS-org  Odd-syllable ending on consonant, with cg. Organizations

LEXICON DUORTNUS-plc  Odd-syllable ending on consonant, with cg.Placenames

* Hardangerduottar # Odd-syllable test examples:*
* *Hardangerduottar:* `Hardangerduottar+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom`
* *Hardangerduoddara:* `Hardangerduottar+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen`
* *Hardangerduoddarij:* `Hardangerduottar+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill`
* *Hardangerduoddaris:* `Hardangerduottar+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ela`

LEXICON TIEMPEL-obj  Same as DUORTNUS, only without second syll vowel change. Odd syllanle case marking Lexicon presently only for two -tiempel-final words. Lule sami stems.

* Artemistiempel # Odd-syllable test  examples:*
* *Artemistiempel:* `Artemistiempel+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Nom`
* *Artemistiemmpelij:* `Artemistiempel+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Ill`
* *Artemistiemmpelin:* `Artemistiempel+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Ine`
* *Artemistiemmpelis:* `Artemistiempel+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Ela`

LEXICON TIEMPEL-org  Same as DUORTNUS, only without second syll vowel change. Odd syllanle case marking Lexicon presently only for two -tiempel-final words. Lule sami stems.

* Artemistiempel # Odd-syllable test  examples:*
* *Samovarteáhtar:* `Samovarteáhtar+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Nom`
* *Samovarteáhttarij:* `Samovarteáhtar+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ill`
* *Samovarteáhttarin:* `Samovarteáhtar+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ine`
* *Samovarteáhttaris:* `Samovarteáhtar+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ela`

Lexicon HEANDARAT is not in use in smj

+Pl+Nom:aQ1 K ;
+Pl+Gen:aQ1j K ;
+Pl+Gen:aQ1j RHyph ;
+Pl+Acc:aQ1jt K ;
+Pl+Ill:aQ1jda K ;
+Pl+Ine:aQ1jn K ;
+Pl+Ela:aQ1js K ;
+Pl+Com:aQ1j K ;

Words in lexicon EATNAMAT are odd-syllable plurals. Lule sami stems and non-assimilated stems.

LEXICON EATNAMAT-plc   Place names. Presently only for Vuolleednama

* Vuolleednama # Contrcted test examples:*
* ★*Vuolleednam:* `Vuolleednama+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom` (is not standard language)
* *Vuolleednama:* `Vuolleednama+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Nom`
* *Vuolleednamijda:* `Vuolleednama+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Ill`
* *Vuolleednamijs:* `Vuolleednama+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Ela`

LEXICON EATNAMAT-org   Organizations

## Contracted proper nouns

Words in lexicon DAVVISUOLLU are contracted propernouns ending on -åj/-oj. Lule sami stems

LEXICON DAVVISUOLU-plc  Contracted stems ending on -oj. Place names.

* Victoriasuoloj # Contracted test examples:*
* *Victoriasuoloj:* `Victoriasuoloj+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom`
* *Victoriasuolluj:* `Victoriasuoloj+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill`
* *Victoriasuollus:* `Victoriasuoloj+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ela`

Words in lexicon GEAVNNIS are contracted propernouns ending on -s.

LEXICON GEAVNNIS-plc   Contracted stems ending on -es. Place names. Lule sami stems.

* Gaza-Sárges # Contracted test examples:*
* *Gaza-Sárges:* `Gaza-Sárges+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom`
* *Gaza-Sárggáj:* `Gaza-Sárges+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill`
* *Gaza-Sárggás:* `Gaza-Sárges+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ela`

Words in lexicon SUOLLOT are contracted plurals. Lule sami stems.

LEXICON SULLOT-plc  Plural names, only names ending on -suollu.

* Falklandsuollu #  test examples:*
* ★*Falklandsuoloj:* `Falklandsuollu+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom` (is not standard language)
* *Falklandsuollu:* `Falklandsuollu+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Nom`
* *Falklandsuollujda:* `Falklandsuollu+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Ill`
* *Falklandsuollujs:* `Falklandsuollu+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Ela`

## Lexicons only used in sme/sma and that are sent to other lexicons in smj

ERVASTI is only used in smi-propenouns. Ervasti names are 3-syllable and are needed as a seperate lexicon because of sma. ERVASTI is same as ACCRA in smj and gets even syllable case marking.

MAKI and NIEMI is only used in smi-propenouns. Maki names are even-syllable finnish names and are needed as a seperate lexicon because of sma. MÄKI is same as ACCRA in smj and gets even syllable case marking.

HANNOLA is the same as ACCRA

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/affixes/propernouns.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-smj/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/affixes/propernouns.lexc)</small>
